Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 47 Weapons
11-47-26.
Penalties for violations.

Unless otherwise specified, any violation of any provision of this chapter shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or both; provided, that a violation of any of the provisions of §§

11-47-1

—

11-47-34

with relation to air rifle, air pistol, “blank gun,” “BB gun,” or other instrument other than a machine gun, shotgun, rifle, or pistol, from which steel or other metal projectiles are propelled, shall for the first offense be punished by a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) and for the second or any subsequent offense by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100), or by imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days, or both; and provided, further, that the provisions of chapter 1 of title 14 shall apply in the case of any person under the age of eighteen (18) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 1052, § 14; P.L. 1929, ch. 1421, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 405, § 3; P.L. 1950, ch. 2452, § 3; G.L. 1956, §§

11-47-20

,

11-47-31

; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-26

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1.

11-47-27.
Standard of proof under §§ 11-47-1 — 11-47-34.

No negative allegation of any kind need be averred or proved in any complaint under §§

11-47-1

—

11-47-34

, and the carrying or use of any firearm contrary to the provisions of those sections shall be evidence that the possession, carrying or use of any firearm is unlawful, but the respondent in any case brought under those sections may show any fact that would render the possession, or use, or carrying of the firearm lawful.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 1052, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-21

; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-27

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1.

11-47-28.
Arrest and detention for possession of firearms.

Every officer authorized to make an arrest may, without complaint and warrant, arrest any person who has in his or her possession any firearm whenever the officer has reasonable ground to suspect that the person possesses or is using or is carrying the firearm contrary to law. Any person so arrested may be detained a reasonable time, not exceeding twenty-four (24) hours, for the purpose of making an investigation concerning the person, but no person so arrested shall be detained longer than twenty-four (24) hours without complaint being made against him or her before some proper court or justice. If the officer making the arrest shall at any time within the twenty-four (24) hours satisfy himself or herself that there is no ground for making a criminal complaint against the person, he or she shall be discharged from custody.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 1052, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-22

; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-28

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1.

11-47-29.
Certification of conviction of alien.

In the case of the conviction under §§

11-47-1

—

11-47-34

of a person who is not a citizen of the United States, it shall be the duty of the clerk of the court in which conviction is secured to certify the fact of the conviction to the proper officer of the United States government having supervision of the deportation of aliens.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 1052, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-23

; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-29

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1.

11-47-30.
Transfer or delivery of firearms to minors.

It shall be unlawful within this state for any person to transfer, give, convey, or cause to be transferred, given, or conveyed any firearm to any person under eighteen (18) years of age, when the person knows or has reason to know that the recipient is under eighteen (18) years of age, except for the limited purposes set forth in §§

11-47-33

and

11-47-34

[repealed] and with the prior approval or consent of the parent or legal guardian of the minor.

Every person violating this section shall be punished, upon conviction, by imprisonment for not less than ten (10) years and not more than twenty (20) years. The prohibitions of this section shall not apply to any federally and state licensed retail dealer who makes reasonable efforts to verify a purchaser’s age and shall not apply to the sale of an air rifle, air pistol, “blank gun”, or “BB gun.”

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 21; P.L. 1950, ch. 2452, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-24

; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-30

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 389, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 285, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 135, § 1, effective June 21, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 136, § 1, effective June 21, 2022.

11-47-31.
Sale, transfer or delivery of ammunition to minors.

It shall be unlawful within this state for any person to sell, transfer, give, convey, or cause to be sold, transferred, given or conveyed any ammunition, including any priming charge of powder, propelling charge of powder, or any form of missile or projectile to be ejected from a firearm to any person under eighteen (18) years of age when the person knows or has reason to know that the recipient is under eighteen (18) years of age, except for the limited purposes set forth in §§

11-47-33

and

11-47-34

[repealed] and with the prior approval or consent of the parent or legal guardian of the minor.

Every person violating this section shall be punished, upon conviction, by imprisonment for a term not to exceed ten (10) years. The prohibitions of this section shall not apply to any federally and state licensed retail dealer who makes reasonable efforts to verify a purchaser’s age and shall not apply to the sale of ammunition for an air rifle, air pistol, “blank gun” or “BB gun.”

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 22; P.L. 1950, ch. 2452, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-25

; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-31

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 389, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 285, § 1.

11-47-32.
Possession of ammunition by minor.

Except as provided in §

11-47-33

, it shall be unlawful within this state for any person under eighteen (18) years of age to possess and use ammunition, including any priming charge of powder, propelling charge of powder, or any form of missile or projectile to be ejected from a firearm.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 23; P.L. 1950, ch. 2452, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-26

; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-32

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 374, § 1.

11-47-33.
Possession of firearms by minors.

It shall be unlawful within this state for any person under eighteen (18) years of age to possess and use any firearm unless the person is in the presence of a parent or guardian or supervising adult at any regular and recognized camp or rifle range approved by the Rhode Island state police or by the chief of police of the city or town in which the camp or rifle range is located; provided, that this provision shall not apply to minors engaged in lawful hunting activity under the supervision of a parent or guardian or qualified adult, minors participating in Reserve Officer Training Corps programs, ceremonial parade activities, competitive and target shooting, participants in state militia activities and minors participating in a basic firearms education program; provided, further, that a person under eighteen (18) years of age may carry a firearm, unloaded, in a suitable case to and from his or her home and the camp or range and from the camp or range to other camp or range when accompanied by a parent, guardian, or supervising adult.

For purposes of this section only, “qualified adult” means any person twenty-one (21) years of age or older and permitted by law to possess and use the firearm.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 24; P.L. 1950, ch. 2452, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-27

; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-33

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 374, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 135, § 1, effective June 21, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 136, § 1, effective June 21, 2022.

11-47-34.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 25; P.L. 1950, ch. 2452, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-28

; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-34

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 374, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 135, § 3, effective June 21, 2022; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 136, § 3, effective June 21, 2022.

11-47-35.
Sale of concealable weapons — Safety courses and tests — Issuance of permits to certain government officers.

No person shall deliver a pistol or revolver to a purchaser until seven (7) days shall have elapsed from twelve o’clock (12:00) noon of the day following the day of application for the purchase, and when delivered, the pistol or revolver shall be unloaded and securely wrapped, with the bill of sale to be enclosed within the wrapper with the pistol or revolver. Any citizen of the United States and/or lawful resident of this state who is twenty-one (21) years of age or older, and any nonresident member of the armed forces of the United States who is stationed in this state and who is twenty-one (21) years of age or older, may, upon application, purchase or acquire a pistol or revolver. At the time of applying for the purchase of a concealable firearm, the purchaser shall: (i) Complete and sign in triplicate and deliver to the person selling the pistol or revolver the application form described in this section, and in no case shall it contain the serial number of the pistol or revolver; and (ii) Present to the person selling the pistol or revolver a pistol/revolver safety certificate issued by the department of environmental management. The certificate shall be retained in the possession of the buyer. The pistol/revolver safety certificate shall certify that the purchaser has completed a basic pistol/revolver safety course as shall be administered by the department of environmental management.

The person selling the pistol or revolver shall on the date of application sign and forward by registered mail, by delivery in person, or by electronic mail if approved by the applicable police department, the original and duplicate copies of the application to the chief of police in the city or town in which the purchaser has his or her residence or to the superintendent of the Rhode Island state police in the instance where the purchaser either resides in the town of Exeter or resides out of state. The superintendent of the Rhode Island state police or the chief of police in the city or town in which the purchaser has his or her residence shall mark or stamp the original copy of the application form with the date and the time of receipt and return it by the most expeditious means to the person who is selling the pistol or revolver. The triplicate copy duly signed by the person who is selling the pistol or revolver shall within seven (7) days be sent by him or her by registered mail, by delivery in person, or by electronic mail to the attorney general. The person who is selling the pistol or revolver shall retain the original copy duly receipted by the police authority to whom sent or delivered for a period of six (6) years with other records of the sale. It shall be the duty of the police authority to whom the duplicate copy of the application form is sent or delivered to make a background check of the applicant to ascertain whether he or she falls under the provisions of §

11-47-5

, §

11-47-6

, §

11-47-7

, or §

11-47-23

. If, after the lapse of seven (7) days from twelve o’clock (12:00) noon of the day following application, no disqualifying information has been received from the investigating police authority by the person who is selling the pistol or revolver, he or she will deliver the firearm applied for to the purchaser. Upon the finding of no disqualifying information under the provisions of the above cited sections of this chapter, and in no case later than thirty (30) days after the date of application, the duplicate and triplicate copies of the application will be destroyed. Retention of the duplicate and triplicate copies in violation of this section or any unauthorized use of the information contained in the copies by a person or agency shall be punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). The provisions of this section shall not apply to bona fide sales at wholesale to duly licensed retail dealers, nor to purchases by retail dealers duly licensed under the provisions of §

11-47-39

.

The department of environmental management shall establish the basic pistol/revolver safety course required by this section. The safety course shall consist of not less than two (2) hours of instruction in the safe use and handling of pistols and revolvers and the course shall be available to buyers continually throughout the year at convenient times and places but at least monthly at locations throughout the state, or more frequently as required. Proficiency in the use of pistols or revolvers shall not be prerequisite to the issuance of the safety certificate. No person shall be required to complete the course more than once; provided, that any person completing the course who is unable to produce the safety certificate issued by the department of environmental management shall be required to take the course again unless the person provides evidence to the department that he or she has successfully completed the course.

The administration of the basic pistol/revolver safety course required by this section shall not exceed the cost of thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) in any fiscal year.

Proof of passage of the department of environmental management’s basic hunter safety course will be equivalent to the pistol/revolver safety certificate mandated by this section.

Any person who has reason to believe that he or she does not need the required handgun safety course may apply by any written means to the department of environmental management to take an objective test on the subject matter of the handgun safety course. The test shall be prepared, as well as an instruction manual upon which the test shall be based, by the department. The manual shall be made available by any means to the applicant who may, within the time limits for application, take the objective test at the department or at any location where the handgun safety course is being given. Any person receiving a passing grade on the test shall be issued a pistol/revolver safety certificate by the department.

[Deleted by P.L. 2005, ch. 20, § 11 and P.L. 2005, ch. 27, § 11.]

The following persons shall be issued basic pistol/revolver permits by the department of environmental management: sheriffs, deputy sheriffs, the superintendent and members of the state police, prison or jail wardens or their deputies, members of the city or town police force, members of the park police, conservation officers, members of the airport police and officers of the United States government authorized by law to carry a concealed firearm and, at the discretion of the department of environmental management, any person who can satisfactorily establish that he or she formerly held one of these offices or were so authorized.

Any person who is serving in the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, or Coast Guard on active duty shall not be required to obtain a basic pistol/revolver safety certificate or basic pistol/revolver permit under this section so long as he or she remains on active duty.

Any person who is serving in the active reserve components of the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, or Coast Guard, or any person in an active duty paid status in the Rhode Island National Guard, shall not be required to obtain a basic pistol/revolver safety certificate under this section so long as he or she remains in active status.

(Face of application form) Application to Purchase Pistol or Revolver Date Hour
A.M. P.M. Name Address (Street and number)(City or town)(State) Date of Birth Place of Birth Height Weight Color hair Color eyes Scars Tattoos Other identifying marks Are you a citizen of the United States Are you a citizen of Rhode Island How long Where stationed (Armed Forces only) Number of pistols and/or revolvers to be purchased Have you ever been convicted of a crime of violence (See ) §

11-47-2

Have you ever been adjudicated or under confinement as addicted to a controlled substance Have you ever been adjudicated or under confinement for alcoholism Have you ever been confined or treated for mental illness From whom is pistol or revolver being purchased Seller’s address Seller’s signature Applicant’s signature (See for penalty for false information on this application) §

11-47-2

3 (Reverse side of application form) AFFIDAVIT: I certify that I have read and am familiar with the provisions of — , inclusive, of the general laws of the State of Rhode Island, and that I am aware of the penalties for violation of the provisions of the cited sections. I further certify that I have completed the required basic pistol/revolver safety course. §§

11-47-1

11-47-55

Signed (over) County of State of Rhode Island Subscribed and sworn before me this day of A.D. 20. Notary Public

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1421, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 405, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-29

; G.L., §

11-47-35

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 206, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 376, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 439, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 530, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 37, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 300, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 146, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 11; P.L. 2000, ch. 128, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 9; P.L. 2005, ch. 20, § 11; P.L. 2005, ch. 27, § 11; P.L. 2007, ch. 497, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 519, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 61, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 68, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 339, § 1, effective July 12, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 340, § 1, effective July 12, 2021.

11-47-35.1.
Persons exempt from § 11-47-35.

The provisions of §

11-47-35

shall not apply to full-time members of the state police, full-time members of the state marshal’s office, full-time members of city or town police departments, or state marshals or correctional officers or persons licensed under §

11-47-11

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 135, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 383, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 202, § 1.

11-47-35.2.
Sale of rifles/shotguns.

No person shall deliver a rifle or shotgun to a purchaser until seven (7) days shall have elapsed from twelve o’clock (12:00) noon of the day following the day of application for the purchase, and when delivered, the rifle or shotgun shall be unloaded and securely wrapped, with the bill of sale for it to be enclosed within the wrapper with the rifle or shotgun. Any citizen of the United States and/or lawful resident of this state who is twenty-one (21) years of age or older, and any nonresident member of the armed forces of the United States who is stationed in this state and who is twenty-one (21) years of age or older, may, upon application, purchase or acquire a rifle or shotgun. At the time of applying for the purchase of a shotgun or rifle the purchaser shall complete and sign in triplicate and deliver to the seller the application form described in this section, and in no case shall it contain the serial number of the rifle or shotgun.

The person who is selling the rifle or shotgun shall, on the date of application, sign and forward by registered mail or by delivery in person, or by electronic mail if approved by the applicable police department, the original and duplicate copies of the application to the chief of police in the city or town in which the purchaser has his or her residence or to the superintendent of the Rhode Island state police in the instance where the purchaser either resides in the town of Exeter or resides out of state. The superintendent of the Rhode Island state police or the chief of police in the city or town in which the purchaser has his or her residence shall mark or stamp the original copy of the application form with the date and time of receipt and return it by the most expeditious means to the seller. The triplicate copy duly signed by the seller shall within seven (7) days be sent by him or her by registered mail, by delivery in person, or by electronic mail, to the attorney general. The person who is selling the rifle or shotgun shall retain the original copy duly receipted by the police authority to whom sent or delivered for a period of six (6) years with other records of the sale. It shall be the duty of the police authority to whom the duplicate copy of the application form is sent or delivered to make a background check of the applicant to ascertain whether he or she falls under the provisions of §

11-47-5

, §

11-47-6

, §

11-47-7

, or §

11-47-23

. If, after the lapse of seven (7) days from twelve o’clock (12:00) noon of the day following application, no disqualifying information has been received from the investigating police authority by the person who is selling the rifle or shotgun, he or she will deliver the firearm applied for to the purchaser. Upon the finding of no disqualifying information under the provisions of the above cited sections of this chapter, and in no case later than thirty (30) days after the date of application, the duplicate and triplicate copies of the application will be destroyed. Retention of the duplicate and triplicate copies in violation of this chapter or any unauthorized use of the information contained in them by a person or agency shall be punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). The provisions of this section shall not apply to bona fide sales at wholesale to duly licensed retail dealers, nor to purchases by retail dealers duly licensed under the provisions of §

11-47-39

.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to full-time members of the state police, full-time members of city or town police departments, persons licensed under §§

11-47-9

and

11-47-11

, or to sales of air rifles or “BB guns” or to sales of antique firearms as defined in §

11-47-2

.

(Face of application form) Application to Purchase Shotgun or Rifle Date Hour A.M. P.M. Name Address (Street and number)(City or town)(State) Date of Birth Place of Birth Height Weight Color hair Color eyes Scars Tattoos Other identifying marks Are you a citizen of the United States Are you a citizen of Rhode Island How long Where stationed (Armed Forces only) Number of rifles and/or shotguns to be purchased Have you ever been convicted of a crime of violence (See ) §

11-47-2

General Laws of Rhode Island Have you ever been adjudicated or under confinement as addicted to a controlled substance Have you ever been adjudicated or under confinement for alcoholism Have you ever been confined or treated for mental illness From whom is shotgun or rifle being purchased Seller’s address Seller’s signature Applicant’s signature (See for penalty for false information on this application) §

11-47-2

3 (Reverse side of application form) AFFIDAVIT: I certify that I have read and am familiar with the provisions of — , inclusive, of the general laws of the State of Rhode Island, and that I am aware of the penalties for violation of the provisions of the cited sections. §§

11-47-1

11-47-59

Signed County of State of Rhode Island Subscribed and sworn before me this day of A.D. 20. Notary Public

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 37, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 300, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 146, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 128, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 61, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 68, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 339, § 1, effective July 12, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 340, § 1, effective July 12, 2021; P.L. 2022, ch. 135, § 1, effective June 21, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 136, § 1, effective June 21, 2022.

11-47-35.3.
Annual report on application process administration.

The attorney general shall provide the judiciary committees of the senate and house of representatives an annual report including the number of applications made pursuant to this section for the prior calendar year. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the number of applications received from sellers, the number of applications resulting in a determination that the potential buyer or transferee was prohibited from receipt or possession of a firearm pursuant to Rhode Island or federal law, the estimated costs of administering this chapter, and the number of instances in which a person requests amendment of the record pertaining to the person pursuant to §§

11-47-35

and

11-47-35

.2.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 300, § 2.

11-47-36.
Purchase of concealable firearms from out of state dealers.

No citizen of this state shall purchase any concealable firearm outside of the state of Rhode Island unless he or she has duly executed the application form prescribed in §

11-47-35

, the application form to be obtained by the purchaser from the city or town clerk of the city or town in which he or she resides or has his place of business. The original and duplicate copies of the application shall be delivered in person, duly executed, by the purchaser to the superintendent of the Rhode Island state police or to the chief of police of the city or town in which the purchaser resides. The purchaser shall send the triplicate copy of the application by registered mail to the attorney general within twenty-four (24) hours of the time of filing with the appropriate police authority. It shall be the duty of the police authority to whom the original and duplicate copies of the application are delivered to check the applicant’s record to ascertain whether he or she falls under the provisions of §

11-47-5

,

11-47-6

,

11-47-7

, or

11-47-23

. If, after the lapse of seventy-two (72) hours from twelve o’clock (12:00) noon of the day following the date of application, no disqualifying record has been found by the investigating police authority, the original and duplicate copies of the application marked or stamped “approved” and signed by the investigating police authority will be returned to the applicant by the most expeditious means. The approved duplicate copy of the application shall be sent by the purchaser to the out-of-state dealer as proof of lawful purchase, and the original shall be retained by the purchaser along with the bill of sale for the firearm purchased for a period of six (6) years as proof of lawful purchase. The triplicate copy of the application shall be retained by the attorney general for a period which shall in no case exceed ninety (90) days, provided that no evidence of the nature as would disqualify the applicant has been found.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1.

11-47-37.
Sale to minors and others forbidden.

No person shall sell a firearm to any person under the age of twenty-one (21) or to one who he or she has reasonable cause to believe falls under the provisions of §

11-47-5

, §

11-47-6

, §

11-47-7

, or §

11-47-23

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 135, § 1, effective June 21, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 136, § 1, effective June 21, 2022.

11-47-37.1.
Persons exempt from age restrictions.

The provision of §

11-47-35.2

prohibiting the sale of rifles and shotguns to any person under twenty-one (21) years of age and the provisions of §

11-47-37

shall not apply to full-time members of the state police, full-time members of the state marshal’s office, full-time members of city or town police departments, or state marshals or correctional officers or persons while serving on active duty as a member of the United States armed forces or organized reserved or National Guard.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 135, § 2, effective June 21, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 136, § 2, effective June 21, 2022.

11-47-38.
Dealers to be licensed.

No retail dealer shall sell or otherwise transfer, or expose for sale or transfer, or have in his or her possession with intent to sell or otherwise transfer, any pistol, revolver, or other firearm without being licensed as provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 278, § 1.

11-47-39.
Issuance and conditions of dealer’s license.

The duly constituted licensing authorities of any city, town, or political subdivision of this state may grant licenses in form prescribed by the attorney general effective for not more than one year from date of issue permitting the licensee to sell pistols and revolvers at retail within this state, subject to the following conditions in addition to those specified in §§

11-47-35

and

11-47-36

, for breach of any of which the license shall be forfeited and the licensee subject to punishment as provided in this chapter:

The business shall be carried on only in the building designated in the license.

The license or a copy of it, certified by the issuing authority, shall be displayed on the premises where it can easily be read.

No pistol or revolver shall be sold in violation of any provision of this chapter, nor shall a pistol or revolver be sold under any circumstances unless the purchaser is personally known to the seller or shall present clear evidence of his or her identity.

The fee for issuing the license shall be five dollars ($5.00). The fee charged for the issuing of the license shall be applied for the use and benefit of the city or town.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1.

11-47-40.
Register of sales of firearms — Display of firearms.

Every person, firm, or corporation selling a pistol, revolver, or other firearm whether the seller is a retail dealer, pawnbroker, or otherwise shall keep a register in which shall be entered at the time of sale the date of sale, name, age, and residence of every purchaser of the a pistol, revolver, or other firearm, together with the caliber, make, model, manufacturer’s number, or other mark of identification on the pistol, revolver, or other firearm. Every person, firm, or corporation who shall fail to keep a register and to enter the acts required by this section shall, upon conviction, be punished as provided in this chapter. The register shall be open at all reasonable hours for the mandatory monthly inspection of licensed firearm dealers to be conducted by state and/or local police officials.

This section shall not apply to wholesale dealers’ bona fide sales at wholesale to duly licensed retail dealers. It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation dealing in firearms to display any pistol, revolver, or imitation, or any firearm of a size which may be concealed upon the person, or placard advertising the sale of one, in any part of the premises of the person, firm, or corporation where it can be readily seen from the outside. “Firearm” as utilized in this section only does not apply to an air rifle, air pistol, “blank gun,” or “BB gun.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1421, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 405, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-30

; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-40

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 278, § 1.

11-47-41.
Government firearm registration prohibited.

No government agency of this state or its political subdivisions shall keep or cause to be kept any list or register of privately owned firearms or any list or register of the owners of those firearms; provided, that the provisions of this section shall not apply to firearms which have been used in committing any crime of violence, nor to any person who has been convicted of a crime of violence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1.

11-47-42.
Weapons other than firearms prohibited.

No person shall carry or possess or attempt to use against another any instrument or weapon of the kind commonly known as a blackjack, slingshot, billy, sandclub, sandbag, metal knuckles, slap glove, bludgeon, stun-gun, or the so called “Kung-Fu” weapons.

No person shall with intent to use unlawfully against another, carry or possess a crossbow, dagger, dirk, stiletto, sword-in-cane, bowie knife, or other similar weapon designed to cut and stab another.

No person shall wear or carry concealed upon his person, any of the above-mentioned instruments or weapons, or any razor, or knife of any description having a blade of more than three (3) inches in length measuring from the end of the handle where the blade is attached to the end of the blade, or other weapon of like kind or description.

Any person violating the provisions of these subsections shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or both, and the weapon so found shall be confiscated.

Any person violating the provisions of these subsections while he or she is incarcerated within the confines of the adult correctional institutions shall be punished by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than three thousand dollars ($3,000), or by imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than five (5) years, or both, and the weapon so found shall be confiscated.

No person shall sell to a person under eighteen (18) years of age, without the written authorization of the minor’s parent or legal guardian, any stink bomb, blackjack, slingshot, bill, sandclub, sandbag, metal knuckles, slap glove, bludgeon, stungun, paint ball gun, so called “kung-fu” weapons, dagger, dirk, stiletto, sword-in-cane, bowie knife, razor, or knife of any description having a blade of more than three inches (3") in length as described in subsection (a) of this section, or any multi-pronged star with sharpened edges designed to be used as a weapon and commonly known as a Chinese throwing star, except that an individual who is actually engaged in the instruction of martial arts and licensed under §

5-43-1

may carry and possess any multi-pronged star with sharpened edges for the sole purpose of instructional use. Any person violating the provisions of this subsection shall be punished by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than three thousand dollars ($3,000), or by imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than five (5) years, or both, and the weapons so found shall be confiscated.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 283, §§ 23, 24; P.L. 1907, ch. 1436, § 1; P.L. 1908, ch. 1572, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, §§ 32, 33; P.L. 1910, ch. 591, § 1; P.L. 1911, ch. 709, § 1; P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 32; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 31; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-32

; G.L., §

11-47-42

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 310, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 79, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 281, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 292, § 1.

11-47-43.
Collectors and police officers exempt from § 11-47-42.

The provisions of §

11-47-42

, so far as they forbid the possession of certain instruments or weapons, shall not apply to any person who possesses or is making a collection of the weapons as curios or for educational, professional, scientific, or any other lawful purpose, without intent to use the instrument or weapon unlawfully. Nor shall the provisions of §

11-47-42

, so far as they relate to the possession or carrying of any billy, apply to sheriffs, town constables, police constables, police, or other officers or guards whose duties require them to arrest or to keep and guard prisoners or property, nor to any person summoned by those officers to aid them in the discharge of their duties while actually engaged in their duties.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 283, § 23; P.L. 1908, ch. 1572, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 32; P.L. 1910, ch. 591, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 33; P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 33; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 32; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-33

; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-43

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 18; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 18.

11-47-44.
Standard of proof under §§ 11-47-42 and 11-47-43.

No negative allegation of any kind need be averred or proved in any complaint under §§

11-47-42

and

11-47-43

, and the possession of any blackjack, slungshot, billy, sandclub, sandbag, metal knuckles, bludgeon, dirk, dagger, stiletto, or other similar weapon designed to cut and stab another, and the carrying or use of any the instrument or weapons or of any of the instruments or weapons forbidden by §

11-47-42

to be carried, worn, or used shall be evidence that the possession, use, wearing, or carrying, as the case may be, of any the instrument or weapon, is unlawful, but the respondent in any the case may show any fact that would render the possession or use, or wearing or carrying of the instrument or weapon lawful.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 283, § 26; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 35; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 34; P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 34; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 33; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-34

; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-44

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1.

11-47-45.
Arrest and detention for possession of weapon prohibited by § 11-47-42.

Every officer authorized to make an arrest for any criminal offense may arrest without complaint and warrant any person who has in his or her possession any instrument or weapon described in §

11-47-42

whenever the officer has reasonable ground to suspect that the person possesses, or is using, wearing or carrying the instrument or weapon contrary to law. Any person so arrested may be detained a reasonable time, not exceeding twenty-four (24) hours, for the purpose of making an investigation concerning the person, but no person so arrested shall be detained longer than twenty-four (24) hours without complaint being made against him or her before some proper court or justice. If the officer making the arrest shall at any time within the twenty-four (24) hours satisfy himself or herself that there is no ground for making a criminal complaint against the person, he or she shall be discharged from custody.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 35; P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 35; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 34; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-35

; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-45

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1.

11-47-46.
Sections 11-47-42 — 11-47-45 inapplicable to firearms.

The provisions of §§

11-47-42

—

11-47-45

shall not be construed to relate to the possession and carrying of air guns, pistols or firearms of any description.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 1052, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 404, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-36

; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-46

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1.

11-47-47.
Display of weapons.

No person, firm, or corporation shall display in a place of business by means of a window display any pistol, revolver, or other firearm, as defined in §

11-47-2

, or any dagger, dirk, bowie knife, stiletto, metal knuckles, or blackjack; provided, that dealers in sporting goods may include in a window display pistols or revolvers upon a permit issued by the chief of police or town sergeant of any city or town. Any person, firm, or corporation violating the provisions of this section shall be punished by a fine not exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for the first offense and one hundred dollars ($100) for every subsequent offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1380, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 607, §§ 11, 12; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-37

; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-47

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 278, § 1.